Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 38. Plants and Plant Products Inspection.

§ 3.2-3800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Dealer”
means any person that acquires nursery stock for the purpose of resale and distribution who is not a grower of nursery stock.

“Inspection certificate”
means a document in any form issued by the Commissioner, or the appropriate official from another state, declaring an item or location to be apparently free from plant pests. Inspection certificates include nursery stock certificates, phytosanitary stock certificates, state-of-origin certificates, or any other certification tags, seals, and stamps that verify compliance with this chapter or any regulations adopted hereunder.

“Nursery”
means any premises where nursery stock is propagated, grown, fumigated, treated, packed, stored, or otherwise prepared for sale or distribution.

“Nursery stock”
means all trees, shrubs, woody vines (including ornamentals), bush fruits, grapevines, fruit trees, and nut trees offered for sale and distribution; all buds, grafts, scions, and cuttings from such plants; and any container, soil, and other packing material with such plants or plant products. It shall also mean herbaceous plants (including strawberry plants, narcissus plants, and narcissus bulbs) if the Board determines that controlling the movement of such plants or bulbs is necessary to control any plant pest. Unless designated by the Board, nursery stock shall not include florist or greenhouse plants for inside culture or use.

“Nurseryman”
means any person that produces nursery stock for sale or distribution.

“Person”
means the term as defined in §

1-230

. The term also means any society.

“Plant pest”
means any living stage of insects, mites, nematodes, slugs, snails, protozoa, other invertebrate animals, bacteria, fungi, other parasitic plants, parasitic plant parts, viruses, any other similar organism, or any infectious substances that can injure, infect, or damage any plants or plant products.

“Plants or plant products”
means any trees, shrubs, vines, forage, fiber, cereal, and all other plants; cuttings, grafts, scions, buds, and all other plant parts; fruit, vegetables, roots, bulbs, seeds, wood, lumber, and all other plant products; or any container, soil, and packing material with plants or plant products.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.1; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-135; 1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.32; 1988, c. 552; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3801.
Powers and duties of the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall:

Protect the agricultural, horticultural, and other interests of the Commonwealth from plant pests; and

Promptly credit all moneys collected by him as repayment to the fund in the state treasury to which such moneys are owed.

The Commissioner may enter into reciprocal agreements with officers of other states so that nursery stock may be sold or delivered in the Commonwealth by out-of-state nurserymen or dealers without the payment of a Virginia registration fee, provided that like privileges are granted to Virginia nurserymen or dealers by such other states.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-178.4, 3-178.15, 3-178.20; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-138, 3.1-149, 3.1-154; 1980, c. 291, §§ 3.1-188.34, 3.1-188.43, 3.1-188.48; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3802.
Permit required to sell or transport plant pests.

It is unlawful to sell, barter, offer for sale, move, transport, deliver, ship, or offer for shipment any plant pests without a permit from the Commissioner stating that such plant pests are: (i) not injurious; (ii) generally present already; or (iii) to be used for scientific purposes subject to specified safeguards.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.14; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-148; 1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.42; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

For similar provisions, see §

3.2-712

.

§ 3.2-3803.
Licenses required of nurserymen or dealers; inspection fees.

It is unlawful for any nurseryman or dealer to offer for sale, sell, deliver, or give away nursery stock unless such person shall have first procured a license from the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall not issue any license to a dealer except upon the payment of $25 for each separate sales location. Any dealer who fails to renew his license within the 30 days following the December 31 expiration date shall pay to the Commissioner a $15 late fee in addition to the license fee.

The Commissioner shall not issue any license to a nurseryman except upon the payment of $75 and receipt of an inspection certificate. At the issuance of the license, each nursery shall also pay an inspection fee of $1.50 for each acre above 50 acres of nursery stock inspected by the Commissioner. Any nurseryman who fails to renew his license within the 30 days following the December 31 expiration date shall pay to the Commissioner a $50 late fee in addition to the license fee.

All licenses shall expire on December 31. Any nurseryman or dealer who fails to renew his license within the 30 days following the December 31 expiration date shall be considered unlicensed for the purposes of subsection B of §

3.2-3808

.

Any nurseryman or dealer who pays to the Commissioner a late fee in accordance with the provisions of subsection B or C is not guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor for failure to renew his license under subsection B of §

3.2-3810

.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.9; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-143; 1980, c. 291, §§ 3.1-188.36, 3.1-188.37; 1988, c. 552; 2008, c. 860; 2018, c. 685.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 685 added the last sentence in subsections B through D; and added subsection E.

§ 3.2-3804.
Inspection certificate required to transport nursery stock.

It is unlawful to knowingly deliver, send, ship, or transport nursery stock within or into the Commonwealth without an inspection certificate clearly attached to each carload, truckload, box, bale, or package.

Nursery stock brought into the Commonwealth under an inspection certificate may be sold and moved by a licensed nurseryman or dealer or agent, but this shall not preclude inspection at any time within the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.11; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-145; 1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.38; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3805.
Inspections upon request.

Any person may apply to the Commissioner for an inspection certificate. The applicant shall agree to pay the expenses incurred by the Commissioner, who may respond to the applicant at his discretion. The Commissioner shall issue an inspection certificate upon successful completion of the inspection and the payment of inspection expenses.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.13; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-147; 1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.41; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3806.
Authority for inspections; right of entry.

All nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution shall be subject to inspection at any time.

The Commissioner may enter any nursery or dealer premises, other than a private dwelling, at reasonable times and under reasonable circumstances to examine nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution to detect plant pests and discharge the duties prescribed herein.

The Commissioner may require any person who possesses nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution to present those items for inspection and to provide full information related to origin, number, and destination.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-178.9, 3-178.16, 3-178.18; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-143, 3.1-150, 3.1-152; 1980, c. 291, §§ 3.1-188.37, 3.1-188.44, 3.1-188.46; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3807.
Eradication and control measures.

The Commissioner may order the owner or custodian of any infested nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution to take eradication and control measures. The owner or custodian shall promptly carry out the order of the Commissioner. The Commissioner may take the eradication or control measures required by the order if the owner or custodian refuses or neglects to carry out the order.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.9; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-143; 1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.37; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3808.
Nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution subject to stop delivery or stop sale.

The Commissioner may stop delivery, stop sale, treat, or order returned to point of origin any nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution if he finds: (i) a plant pest infection; or (ii) the exhibition of visual symptoms of a plant pest infestation.

The Commissioner may stop delivery or stop sale of: (i) any nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution in the possession of an unlicensed nurseryman or dealer; or (ii) any nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution that are not accompanied by an inspection certificate.

Any order of the Commissioner under this section shall be carried out at the owner’s expense.

History.

1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.39; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3809.
Seizure and disposition of nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution.

Any nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the Commissioner to the appropriate court. If the court finds the nursery stock or plant products for sale or distribution to be in violation of this chapter and orders condemnation, such nursery stock or plant products shall be seized, destroyed, treated, or returned to the point of origin at the owner’s expense.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-178.12; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-146; 1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.40; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3810.
Penalty for violation.

The Commissioner may refuse, suspend, or cancel any license upon satisfactory evidence that the applicant or licensee has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted hereunder.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted hereunder or interfering in any way with the Commissioner in the discharge of his duties herein is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-178.18, 3-178.19; 1964, c. 476; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-152, 3.1-153; 1980, c. 291, §§ 3.1-188.36, 3.1-188.46, 3.1-188.47; 1988, c. 552; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-3811.
Judicial review.

Judicial review of any action of the Board or the Commissioner shall be in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1980, c. 291, § 3.1-188.49; 2008, c. 860.